District of Columbia statutes.
7-1803.01

Findings and purpose.

The Council finds that violations of part A of this subchapter threaten the integrity of the tobacco Master Settlement Agreement, as defined in § 7-1801.01, the fiscal soundness of the District, and the public health and that enacting the procedural enhancements set forth in this part will aid in the enforcement of part A of this subchapter and thereby safeguard the Master Settlement Agreement, the fiscal soundness of the District, and the public health.

Apr. 22, 2004, D.C. Law 15-150, § 2, 51 DCR 2809